Hawaii, session 2025, GM1378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that adults with
intellectual or developmental disabilities experience
disproportionate health disparities compared to those without
disabilities. Individuals with intellectual or developmental
disabilities are more likely than their peers without
disabilities to have fair or poor health, be considered obese,
and be diagnosed with chronic diseases, such as diabetes.
Intellectual and developmental disabilities are life-long
differences that typically arise before adulthood and can
uniquely influence the trajectory of an individual's life,
including their physical, intellectual, behavioral, and
emotional development. The state council on developmental
disabilities was created to advocate for and improve and protect
the lives of individuals with intellectual or developmental
disabilities in the State.
Decades of research have clearly established that members
of minority groups living in the United States receive poor
2025-2826 SB850 GDI SMA-l.docx
|[Blllllllllll!lllllliHl!lHIII9

Page 2 850
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
health care and have poor health outcomes resulting from social
determinants of health. On a national level, racial and ethnic
disparities in access to health care and health outcomes are a
persistent, pervasive public health problem. In the State,
underserved populations, such as Native Hawaiians and other
Pacific Islanders, have been historically underrepresented in
health care, as data does not accurately reflect the health
disparities currently faced by this group. Additionally,
individuals from the neighbor islands are also underrepresented
and underserved, as access to health care resources and services
are limited. However, even less is known about the extent of
racial and ethnic health disparities among adults with
intellectual or developmental disabilities. Accordingly, there
is an urgent need to create an updated, accurate set of data
that reflects the State's unique need to assist certain agencies
to better understand the needs of individuals with intellectual
or developmental disabilities in their communities.
The legislature further finds troubling gaps in the health
disparities of people with intellectual or developmental
disabilities and their social determinants of health in the
State. Certain recent health surveys in the State and existing
2025-2826 SB850 CDl SMA-l.docx 2

Page 3
S.B. NO.
"2
C.D. 1
related initiatives do not segregate data pertaining to
individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities, nor
is the data publicly available. Presently, the State relies on
prevalence rate data from the federal government published in
1994-1995 that does not reflect the State's current population
and its specific needs. The State's prevalence rate is 1.58 per
cent, which equals approximately twenty-two thousand people who
have an intellectual or developmental disability. Additionally,
the only substantial data the state council on developmental
disabilities collects on intellectual or developmental
disabilities is through the medicaid waiver program, which
serves approximately three thousand people. As there is a gap
of approximately nineteen thousand people who may have an
intellectual or developmental disability in the State, there is
IS little information on quality of life, health care access, and
health care outcomes for uncounted individuals with intellectual
or developmental disabilities.
Accordingly, the legislature finds that further research is
needed to understand the health disparities of people with
intellectual or developmental disabilities and their social
determinants of health. It is therefore imperative for the
2025-2826 SB850 GDI SMA-l.docx

Page 4 850
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
CD. 1
State to establish fundamental baseline data for service
evaluation, policy development, and research to serve the
current and future needs of individuals with intellectual or
developmental disabilities. Accurate, current data will also
help the State to provide culturally appropriate health care,
address barriers to health care access, reduce health
disparities, increase employment opportunities, and support
individuals with developmental or intellectual disabilities to
live healthy lives in the community.
Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to require, and
appropriate funds for, the state council on developmental
disabilities to study the health disparities experienced by
individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities in
the State to develop data to inform the State's public health
IS policies and practices.
SECTION 2. (a) The state council on developmental
disabilities shall collect comprehensive data to identify gaps
in social determinants of health, especially in the areas of
health care access and quality and economic stability, that
affect health outcomes and health disparities experienced by
individuals with intellectual or development disabilities in the
2025-2826 SB850 CDl SMA-l.docx 4
iiiiiiiiniiiUHiiiiiiiii^

Page 5
S.B. NO.
”2
• ■ • h.D. 1
C.D. 1
State and that can be addressed with policy, legislative, or
stakeholder action.
(b) The state council on developmental disabilities shall
submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days
prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027, which
shall include a list of recommendations and proposals, based on
the council's findings, on how state agencies and departments
can implement legislation and policies to reduce health
disparities experienced by individuals with intellectual or
developmental disabilities. The report shall also include:
(1) A definition of the State's intellectual or
developmental disability population for public health
administration purposes, including the health
conditions, duration, and level of severity required
to qualify for disability status;
(2) A definition of the social determinants of health as
used by the United States Department of Health and
Human Services;
(3) Population-level differences in the State between
individuals with and without intellectual or
2025-2826 SB850 GDI SMA-l.docx

Page 6
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
developmental disabilities on health indicators and
social determinants of health, including:
(A) Access to necessary health care;
(B) Access to preventive health care, including
wellness programs and emotional support services;
(C) Health behaviors, including the percentage of
individuals who engage in physical activities or
smoke cigarettes;
(D) Health status and outcomes, including the
percentage of individuals who are considered
obese or diagnosed with chronic diseases,
including diabetes, hypertension, and
cardiovascular diseases;
(E) Drivers of health outcomes, including the impetus
to seek health care and how individuals seek
health care;
(F) Emergency preparedness, including evacuation
planning and ability;
(G) Health insurance coverage;
(H) Social determinants of health and health
outcomes, including household income, employment
2025-2826 SB850 CDl SMA-l.docx 6

Page 7 S.B. NO. S.2
h.D. 1
C.D. 1
status, education level, access to health
information technology tools and systems, access
to transportation, and the social and community
environment; and
(I) Other indicators and determinants that contribute
to an individual's physical and mental health;
(4) Factors contributing to the population-level
differences, including race, ethnicity, gender, age,
county of residence, and economic and social
disadvantages and discrimination;
(5) A determination of the population-level differences
and contributing factors that are preventable or
avoidable;
(6) Any other information that would assist the State in
determining safe, equitable, and culturally
appropriate public health actions that would improve
health care and address the health disparities
experienced by individuals in the State with
intellectual or developmental disabilities; and
(7) Proposed legislation, including best practices, for
the State to reduce the health disparities experienced
2025-2826 SB850 GDI SMA-l.docx

Page 8 850
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D, 1
by individuals in the State with intellectual or
developmental disabilities.
(c) In preparing the report, the state council on
developmental disabilities may consult with community
stakeholders on the following:
(1) Improvements to provider training about intellectual
or developmental disabilities;
(2) Life experiences of individuals with intellectual or
developmental disabilities;
(3) Accessibility mandates for health infrastructure that
include the needs of individuals with intellectual or
developmental disabilities;
(4) Communication guidelines and standards for health care
providers to communicate with individuals with
intellectual or developmental disabilities; and
(5) Other topics as deemed relevant by the state council
on developmental disabilities.
(d) For the purposes of this Act:
"Health disparities" means population-level differences in
health outcomes that are related to a history of social,
economic, or environmental disadvantages that are avoidable and
2025-2826 SB850 CDl SMA-l.docx
iMinuiiiiiwiMiggMiii

Page 9
S.B. NO. S.2
CD. 1
not primarily caused by underlying health conditions that led to
the disability.
"Intellectual or developmental disability" means a lifelong
physical or mental disability, or both, that typically arises
before adulthood that uniquely influences the trajectory of the
individual's physical, intellectual, behavioral, and emotional
development and impacts how individuals experience the world
around them.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $550,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 for the state council on developmental disabilities to
collect comprehensive data and compile and submit to the
legislature a report pursuant to this Act.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of health for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-2826 SB850 CDl SMA-l.docx

S.B. NO. --
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 2ncl day of July ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI I

S.B. No. 850, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 850, SD 2, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives